Illinois, session 104th, SB3178.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Municipal Water System Repurchase Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that: 8        (1) Water systems are critical public infrastructure 9    that directly impact public health, economic development, 10    and environmental protection. 11        (2) Some municipalities have sold these systems to 12    investor-owned utilities but may wish to regain local 13    control when service quality, rates, or accountability do 14    not meet community expectations. 15        (3) A clear statutory process for repurchase by 16    municipalities will empower local governance while 17    maintaining regulatory protections and ensuring orderly 18    transitions.19    (b) The purpose of this Act is to establish a clear and 20equitable legal pathway for municipalities to repurchase water 21systems from regulated private utilities when certain 22conditions are met.   SB3178- 2 -LRB104 20198 RTM 33649 b1    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:2    "Investor-owned utility" means any public utility subject 3to the jurisdiction of the Illinois Commerce Commission that 4provides water services, wastewater services, or both water 5services and wastewater services. 6    "Municipality" means a city, village, or incorporated town 7in the State. 8    "Water system" means a public utility facility used for 9producing, treating, transmitting, distributing, or disposing 10of water or wastewater services serving residential and 11commercial customers.  12    Section 15. Municipal authority to repurchase an 13investor-owned utility. 14    (a) A municipality may repurchase an investor-owned 15utility if the municipality finds that: 16        (1) the investor-owned utility is repeatedly 17    non-compliant with the service quality standards mandated 18    by the Illinois Commerce Commission; 19        (2) water or wastewater service rates charged by the 20    investor-owned utility have increased beyond the rate of 21    inflation without corresponding improvements in service 22    quality; or 23        (3) a majority of the electorate in the municipality 24    votes in favor of repurchase in a binding referendum. 25    (b) A municipality seeking repurchase must adopt an   SB3178- 3 -LRB104 20198 RTM 33649 b1ordinance by its corporate authorities setting forth the basis 2for repurchase and providing notice to all affected customers 3and the investor-owned utility. 4    Section 20. Notice. If a municipality adopts an ordinance 5to repurchase an investor-owned utility, then the municipality 6shall provide written notice to: 7        (1) the investor-owned utility; 8        (2) the Illinois Commerce Commission; and 9        (3) all affected customers.  10    Section 25. Public hearing. A municipality shall hold at 11least one public hearing at least 30 days after the 12municipality has completed the notice requirements under 13Section 20. The public hearing shall allow for public comment 14on the proposed repurchase. 15    Section 30. Illinois Commerce Commission filing. A 16municipality shall file a petition with the Illinois Commerce 17Commission for approval of the repurchase before the 18municipality may repurchase an investor-owned utility. A 19municipality may not repurchase an investor-owned utility 20unless the petition is approved. The petition must include:21        (1) the repurchase plan; 22        (2) proposed terms and compensation;23        (3) estimated impact on rates; and   SB3178- 4 -LRB104 20198 RTM 33649 b1        (4) a transition plan to ensure uninterrupted service. 2    Section 35. Illinois Commerce Commission review and 3approval. 4    (a) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall review a 5petition to repurchase an investor-owned utility within 180 6days of receiving the petition. The Illinois Commerce 7Commission may approve the repurchase if it finds that: 8        (1) the municipality has complied with notice and 9    hearing requirements of this Act; 10        (2) the municipality used a reasonable method to 11    determine the value of the investor-owned utility; 12        (3) the repurchase of the investor-owned utility shall 13    not cause unreasonable harm to customers or service 14    continuity; and 15        (4) the transition plan provides for uninterrupted 16    utility service. 17    (b) In the Illinois Commerce Commission's approval of a 18repurchase, the Illinois Commerce Commission may impose 19conditions necessary to protect customers and ensure 20compliance with safety and service standards. 21    Section 40. Transition and continuity of service. 22    (a) If the Illinois Commerce Commission approves a 23municipality's petition to repurchase an investor-owned 24utility, then the investor-owned utility shall transfer all   SB3178- 5 -LRB104 20198 RTM 33649 b1facilities, records, and customer accounts to the municipality 2or its designated public entity. 3    (b) The investor-owned utility shall cooperate and assist 4in the transition, including workforce considerations, and 5comply with all labor laws. 6    Section 45. Valuation and compensation. 7    (a) The purchase price for any system repurchased under 8this Act shall be determined by the fair market value of the 9system, including all physical assets and customer accounts, 10less depreciation, as determined by an independent valuation 11agreed upon by the parties or ordered by the Illinois Commerce 12Commission. 13    (b) The process for valuation shall be transparent and 14include opportunities for both the investor-owned utility and 15the municipality to submit evidence. 16    Section 50. Rate setting after repurchase. 17    (a) Following repurchase, the municipality may establish 18rates consistent with statutory requirements and in 19consultation with the Illinois Commerce Commission or 20appropriate regulatory authority to ensure rates are fair, 21just, and reasonable. 22    (b) Any new rate structure shall include considerations 23for low-income affordability programs.   SB3178- 6 -LRB104 20198 RTM 33649 b1    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 2severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.